Massachusetts, session 194th, H4746.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. The General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, are hereby
2 amended by inserting after chapter 93L the following chapter:
3 Chapter 93M. Massachusetts Consumer Data Privacy Act
4 Section 1. Definitions.
5 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
6 “Affiliate” means a legal entity that shares common branding with another legal entity or
7 controls, is controlled by or is under common control with another legal entity. For the purposes
8 of this definition, “control” and “controlled” mean:
9 (i) ownership of, or the power to vote, more than fifty per cent of the outstanding shares
10 of any class of voting security of a company;
11 (ii) control in any manner over the election of a majority of the directors or of individuals
12 exercising similar functions; or
1 of 48

13 (iii) the power to exercise controlling influence over the management of a company.
14 “Affirmative Consent” means a clear affirmative act signifying a consumer's freely given,
15 specific, informed and unambiguous authorization for an act or practice after having been
16 informed, in response to a specific request from a controller, provided that:
17 (i) the request is provided to the consumer in a clear and conspicuous stand-alone
18 disclosure;
19 (ii) the request includes a description of the processing purpose for which the consumer’s
20 consent is sought and:
21 (A) clearly distinguishes between an act or practice that is necessary to fulfill a request of
22 the consumer and an act or practice that is for another purpose;
23 (B) clearly states the specific categories of personal data that the controller intends to
24 collect, process, transfer, or sell under each act or practice; and
25 (C) is written in easy-to-understand language and includes a prominent heading that
26 would enable a reasonable consumer to identify and understand each act or practice;
27 (iii) the request clearly explains the consumer's rights related to consent;
28 (iv) the request is made in a manner reasonably accessible to and usable by consumers
29 with disabilities;
30 (v) the request is made prior to the controller’s implementation of the act or practice;
31 (vi) the request is made available to the consumer in each language in which the
32 controller provides a product or service for which authorization is sought;
2 of 48

33 (vii) the option to refuse to give consent is at least as prominent as the option to give
34 consent and the option to refuse to give consent takes the same number of steps or fewer as the
35 option to give consent; and
36 (viii) affirmative consent to an act or practice is not inferred from the inaction of the
37 consumer or the consumer's continued use of a service or product provided by the controller.
38 “Affirmative Consent” does not include:
39 (i) acceptance of a general or broad terms of use or similar document that contains
40 descriptions of personal data processing along with other, unrelated information;
41 (ii) hovering over, muting, pausing or closing a given piece of content;
42 (iii) agreement obtained through the use of a false, fraudulent, or materially misleading
43 statement or representation; or
44 (iv) agreement obtained through the use of dark patterns.
45 “Authenticate” means to use reasonable means to determine that a request to exercise any
46 of the rights afforded under this chapter is being made by, or on behalf of, the consumer who is
47 entitled to exercise such consumer rights with respect to the personal data at issue.
48 “Biometric data” means data generated by automatic measurements of an individual's
49 biological characteristics, such as a fingerprint, a voiceprint, eye retinas, irises, gait, or other
50 unique biological patterns or characteristics that can be used to identify a specific individual.
51 “Biometric data” does not include:
52 (i) a digital or physical photograph,
3 of 48

53 (ii) an audio or video recording, or
54 (iii) any data generated from a digital or physical photograph, or an audio or video
55 recording, unless such data is generated to identify a specific individual.
56 “Browser” means an interactive software application that is primarily used by consumers
57 to access internet websites.
58 “Business associate” has the same meaning as provided in HIPAA.
59 “Child” has the same meaning as provided in COPPA.
60 “Collect” means buying, renting, gathering, obtaining, receiving, accessing, or otherwise
61 acquiring personal data by any means.
62 “Consumer” means an individual who is a resident of this state. “Consumer” does not
63 include an individual acting as an employee, owner, director, officer or contractor of a company,
64 partnership, sole proprietorship, nonprofit or government agency whose communications or
65 transactions with the controller occur solely within the context of that individual's role with the
66 company, partnership, sole proprietorship, nonprofit or government agency.
67 “Consumer health and wellness data” means personal data that is collected by a health
68 and wellness device or application that is not otherwise biometric data, neural data, genetic data
69 or personal data that reveals a mental or physical health condition, diagnosis, disability, or
70 treatment.
71 "Contextual advertising” means displaying or presenting an advertisement that does not
72 vary based on the identity of the individual recipient and is based solely on—
4 of 48

73 (i) the immediate content of a webpage or online service within which the advertisement
74 appears; or
75 (ii) a specific request of the consumer for information or feedback if displayed in
76 proximity to the results of such request for information;
77 Provided, however, that a controller may use the following types of personal data to
78 display a contextual advertisement so long as the personal data is not used to make inferences
79 about the consumer, profile the consumer, or for any other purpose, and that the consumer may
80 use technical means to obfuscate or change their physical location and to specify a language
81 preference —
82 (i) such technical specifications as are necessary for the ad to be delivered and display
83 properly on a given device;
84 (ii) a consumer’s immediate presence in a geographic area with a radius no smaller than
85 10 miles, or an area reasonably estimated to include online activity from at least 5,000 users, but
86 not including precise geolocation data; or
87 (iii) the consumer’s language preferences, as inferred from context, browser settings, or
88 user settings.
89 “Controller” means a person who, alone or jointly with others, determines the purpose
90 and means of collecting or processing personal data.
91 “COPPA” means the Children's Online Privacy Protection Act of 1998, 15 USC 6501 et
92 seq., and the regulations, rules, guidance and exemptions adopted pursuant to said act, as said act
93 and such regulations, rules, guidance and exemptions may be amended from time to time.
5 of 48

94 “Covered entity” has the same meaning as provided in HIPAA.
95 “Dark pattern” means a user interface designed or manipulated with the substantial effect
96 of subverting or impairing user autonomy, decision-making or choice, and includes, but is not
97 limited to, any practice the Federal Trade Commission refers to as a “dark pattern”.
98 “Decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning the consumer”
99 means decisions that result in access to, or the provision or denial by the controller of, financial
100 or lending services, housing, insurance, education enrollment or opportunity, criminal justice,
101 employment opportunities, health care services or access to essential goods or services.
102 “De-identified data” means data that does not identify and cannot reasonably be used to
103 infer information about, or otherwise be linked to, an identified or identifiable individual, or a
104 device linked to such individual, if the controller that possesses such data:
105 (i) takes reasonable physical, administrative, and technical measures to ensure that such
106 data cannot be associated with an individual or be used to re-identify any individual or device
107 that identifies or is linked or reasonably linkable to an individual,
108 (ii) publicly commits to process such data only in a de-identified fashion and not attempt
109 to re-identify such data, and
110 (iii) contractually obligates any recipients of such data to satisfy the criteria set forth in
111 subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this definition.
112 “First party” means a consumer-facing controller with which the consumer intends or
113 expects to interact.
6 of 48

114 “First-party advertising” means processing by a first party of its own first-party data for
115 the purposes of advertising and marketing and carried out—
116 (i) through direct communications with a consumer, such as direct mail, email, or text
117 message communications;
118 (ii) in a physical location operated by the first party; or
119 (iii) through display or presentation of an advertisement on the first party’s own website,
120 application or its other online content.
121 “First-party advertising” includes marketing measurement related to such advertising and
122 marketing.
123 “First-party data” means personal data collected directly from a consumer by a first party,
124 including based on a visit by the consumer to or use by the consumer of a website, a physical
125 location, or an online service operated by the first party.
126 “Gender-affirming health care services” shall have the same meaning as defined in
127 section 11I ½ of chapter 12.
128 “Gender-affirming health data” means any personal data concerning an effort made by a
129 consumer to seek, or a consumer's receipt of, gender-affirming health care services.
130 “Genetic data” means any data, regardless of its format, that concerns an individual’s
131 genetic characteristics, including, but not limited to raw sequence data that results from the
132 sequencing of the complete, or a portion of the, extracted deoxyribonucleic acid of an individual
133 or any genotypic and phenotypic information that results from analyzing such raw sequence data.
7 of 48

134 “Health and wellness device or application” means a device or application that is
135 designed to allow a consumer to track or monitor information regarding the consumer’s health
136 and wellness, including but not limited to fitness, nutrition, diet, physical activity, sleep, mental
137 state, stress, or behavior, either retroactively or in real time;
138 “HIPAA” means the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, 42
139 USC 1320d et seq., as amended from time to time.
140 “Identified or identifiable individual” means an individual who can be readily identified,
141 directly or indirectly.
142 “Large data holder” means a controller or processor that in the most recent calendar year:
143 (i) had annual gross revenues of $200,000,000 or more; and
144 (ii) collected, processed, or transferred the covered data of more than 2,000,000
145 consumers or devices that identify or are linked or reasonably linkable to one or more
146 consumers, excluding covered data collected and processed solely for the purpose of initiating,
147 rendering, billing for, finalizing, completing, or otherwise collecting payment for a requested
148 product or service; or the sensitive covered data of more than 200,000 consumers or devices that
149 identify or are linked or reasonably linkable to one or more consumers.
150 The term “large data holder” does not include any instance in which the controller or
151 processor would qualify as a large data holder solely on the basis of collecting or processing
152 personal email addresses, personal telephone numbers, or log-in information of an individual or
153 device to allow the individual or device to log in to an account administered by the controller or
154 processor.
8 of 48

155 “Legally-protected health care activity” shall have the same meaning as defined in
156 section 11I ½ of chapter 12.
157 “Legally-protected health care data” means any personal data concerning any effort made
158 by a consumer to seek, or a consumer’s receipt of, legally-protected health care activity.
159 “Marketing measurement” means measuring and reporting on marketing performance or
160 media performance by the controller, including processing personal data for measurement and
161 reporting of frequency, attribution, and performance.
162 “Minor” means any individual who is younger than 18 years of age.
163 “Neural data” means information that is generated by measuring the activity of an
164 individual’s central or peripheral nervous system.
165 “Person” means an individual, association, company, limited liability company,
166 corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, trust or other legal entity.
167 “Personal data” means any information, including derived data and unique identifiers,
168 that is linked or reasonably linkable, alone or in combination with other information, to an
169 identified or identifiable individual or a device that identifies or is linked or reasonably linkable
170 to an individual. “Personal data” does not include de-identified data or publicly available
171 information.
172 “Precise geolocation data” means information derived from technology, including, but
173 not limited to, latitude and longitude coordinates from global positioning system mechanisms or
174 other similar positional data, that reveals the past or present physical location of an individual or
9 of 48

175 device that identifies or is linked or reasonably linkable to 1 or more individuals with precision
176 and accuracy within a radius of 1,750 feet.
177 “Precise geolocation data” does not include the content of communications, a photograph
178 or video, metadata associated with a photograph or video that cannot be linked to an individual,
179 or any data generated by or connected to advanced utility metering infrastructure systems or
180 equipment for use by a utility.
181 “Process” means to perform any operation or set of operations , whether by manual or
182 automated means, on personal data or on sets of personal data, such as the use, storage,
183 disclosure, analysis, deletion or modification of personal data.
184 “Processor” means a person who collects, processes, or transfers personal data on behalf
185 of, and at the direction of, a controller or another processor, or a Federal, State, Tribal, or local
186 government entity.
187 “Profiling” means any form of processing performed on personal data to evaluate,
188 analyze or predict personal aspects including an individual’s economic situation, health, personal
189 preferences, interests, reliability, behavior, location or movements.
190 “Protected health information” has the same meaning as provided in HIPAA.
191 “Publicly available information” means information that has been lawfully made
192 available to the general public from:
193 (i) federal, state or municipal government records, if the person collects, processes, and
194 transfers such information in accordance with any restrictions or terms of use placed on the
195 information by the relevant government entity;
10 of 48

196 (ii) widely distributed media; or
197 (iii) a disclosure to the general public as required by federal, state, or local law.
198 “Publicly available information” does not include:
199 (i) Any obscene visual depiction, as defined in section 1460 of title 18, United States
200 Code;
201 (ii) any inference made exclusively from multiple independent sources of publicly
202 available information that reveals sensitive data with respect to a consumer;
203 (iii) biometric data;
204 (iv) personal data that is created through the combination of personal data with publicly
205 available information;
206 (v) genetic or neural data, unless otherwise made publicly available by the individual to
207 whom the information pertains;
208 (vi) information made available by a consumer on a website or online service made
209 available to all members of the public, for free or for a fee, where the consumer has restricted the
210 information to a specific audience; or
211 (vii) intimate images, authentic or computer-generated, known to be nonconsensual,
212 including, but not limited to, images distributed in violation of section 43A of chapter 265.
213 “Reproductive or sexual health care” means any health care-related services or products
214 rendered or provided concerning a consumer's reproductive system or sexual well-being,
11 of 48

215 including, but not limited to, reproductive health care services as defined in section 11I ½ of
216 chapter 12 or any such service or product rendered or provided concerning
217 (i) an individual’s health condition, status, disease, diagnosis, diagnostic test or treatment,
218 (ii) a social, psychological, behavioral or medical intervention,
219 (iii) a surgery or procedure, including, but not limited to, an abortion,
220 (iv) a use or purchase of a medication, including, but not limited to, a medication used or
221 purchased for the purposes of an abortion,
222 (v) a bodily function, vital sign or symptom,
223 (vi) a measurement of a bodily function, vital sign or symptom, or
224 (vii) an abortion, including, but not limited to, medical or nonmedical services, products,
225 diagnostics, counseling or follow-up services for an abortion.
226 “Reproductive or sexual health data” means any personal data concerning an effort made
227 by a consumer to seek, or a consumer's receipt of, reproductive or sexual health care.
228 “Sale of personal data” means the exchange of personal data for monetary or other
229 valuable consideration by the controller to a third party.
230 “Sale of personal data” does not include:
231 (i) the disclosure of personal data to a processor that processes the personal data on
232 behalf of the controller;
12 of 48

233 (ii) the disclosure of personal data to a third party for purposes of providing a product or
234 service requested by the consumer;
235 (iii) the disclosure or transfer of personal data to an affiliate of the controller;
236 (iv) with the consumer’s affirmative consent, the disclosure of personal data where the
237 consumer affirmatively directs the controller to disclose the personal data or intentionally uses
238 the controller to interact with a third party; or
239 (v) the disclosure or transfer of personal data to a third party as an asset that is part of a
240 merger, acquisition, bankruptcy or other transaction or a proposed merger, acquisition,
241 bankruptcy or other transaction, in which the third party assumes control of all or part of the
242 controller’s assets; or
243 (vi) the disclosure of personal data that the consumer:
244 (A) intentionally made available to the general public via a channel of mass media; and
245 (B) did not restrict to a specific audience.
246 “Sensitive data” means personal data that includes:
247 (i) data revealing a consumer’s (A) racial or ethnic origin, color, national origin or
248 citizenship or immigration status; (B) religious beliefs; (C) mental or physical health condition,
249 diagnosis, disability or treatment, including, but not limited to, gender-affirming health data,
250 reproductive or sexual health data or legally-protected health care data; (D) sex life, sexual
251 orientation, status as transgender or non-binary; (E) union membership; (F) status as a victim of a
252 crime; or (G) status as a military servicemember or veteran;
13 of 48

253 (ii) consumer health and wellness data;
254 (iii) genetic, neural, or biometric data;
255 (iv) personal data of a consumer that a controller knows, or willfully disregards, is a
256 minor;
257 (v) precise geolocation data;
258 (vi) a government-issued identifier, including a Social Security number, passport number
259 or driver's license number, that is not required by law to be displayed in public; or
260 (vii) account names, passwords, usernames, access codes, security questions or answers,
261 or other credentials and information used to log in to an account or device.
262 “Targeted advertising” means displaying or presenting an online advertisement to a
263 consumer or to a device identified by a unique persistent identifier (or to a group of consumers or
264 devices identified by unique persistent identifiers), if the advertisement is selected based, in
265 whole or in part, on known or predicted preferences, characteristics, behavior, or interests
266 associated with the consumer or a device identified by a unique persistent identifier.
267 “Targeted advertising” includes displaying or presenting an online advertisement for a
268 product or service based on the previous interaction of a consumer or a device identified by a
269 unique persistent identifier with such product or service on a website or online service that does
270 not share common branding with the website or online service displaying or presenting the
271 advertisement, and marketing measurement related to such advertisements.
272 “Targeted advertising” does not include:
14 of 48

273 (i) first-party advertising; or
274 (ii) contextual advertising.
275 “Third party” means a person that collects personal data from another person that is not
276 the consumer to whom the data pertains and is not a processor with respect to such data.
277 “Third party” does not include a person that collects personal data from another entity if
278 the two entities are affiliates.
279 “Trade secret” has the same meaning as provided in section 42 of chapter 93.
280 “Transfer” means to disclose, release, disseminate, make available, license, rent, or share
281 personal data to a third party orally, in writing, electronically, or by any other means.
282 “Unique persistent identifier” means a technologically created identifier to the extent that
283 such identifier is reasonably linkable to a consumer or a device that identifies or is linked or
284 reasonably linkable to 1 or more consumers, including device identifiers, Internet Protocol
285 addresses, cookies, beacons, pixel tags, mobile ad identifiers or similar technology customer
286 numbers, unique pseudonyms, user aliases, telephone numbers, or other forms of persistent or
287 probabilistic identifiers that are linked or reasonably linkable to 1 or more consumers or devices.
288 The term “unique persistent identifier” does not include an identifier assigned by a
289 controller for the sole purpose of giving effect to the exercise of affirmative consent or opt out by
290 a consumer with respect to the collecting, processing, and transfer of personal data or otherwise
291 limiting the collecting, processing, or transfer of personal data.
292 Section 2. Applicability.
15 of 48

293 The provisions of this chapter apply to persons that conduct business in this state or
294 persons that produce products or services that are targeted to residents of this state and that
295 during the preceding calendar year:
296 (a) Collected or processed the personal data of not less than 100,000 consumers,
297 excluding personal data controlled or processed solely for the purpose of completing a payment
298 transaction, so long as all personal data collected or processed for such purpose was deleted or
299 de-identified within 90 days, except when necessary to investigate fraud or as consistent with a
300 business’s return policy;
301 (b) derived gross revenue from the sale of personal data; or
302 (c) collected or processed sensitive data.
303 Section 3. Scope.
304 (a) The provisions of this chapter, except for the provisions of paragraph (4) of
305 subsection (a) of section 6, do not apply to:
306 (1) any Federal, State, Tribal, territorial, or local government entity such as a
307 body, authority, board, bureau, commission, district or agency of the Commonwealth or of any
308 political subdivision of the Commonwealth;
309 (2) a nonprofit organization established to detect and prevent fraudulent acts in
310 connection with insurance that is operating solely for that purpose;
311 (3) a national securities association registered pursuant to section 15A of the Securities
312 Exchange Act of 1934 and the rules and implementing regulations promulgated thereunder;
16 of 48

313 (4) a registered futures association designated pursuant to section 17 of the Commodity
314 Exchange Act and the rules and implementing regulations promulgated thereunder;
315 (5) a bank, credit union or any affiliate or subsidiary thereof that: (A) is only and directly
316 engaged in financial activities as described in 12 USC 1843(k); (B) is regulated and examined by
317 the division of banks or an applicable federal bank regulatory agency; and (C) has established a
318 program to comply with all applicable requirements established by the commissioner of banks or
319 the applicable federal bank regulatory agency concerning personal data; or
320 (6) an agent, broker-dealer, investment adviser or investment adviser representative, as
321 defined in section 401 of chapter 110A, who is regulated by the secretary of the commonwealth
322 or the United States Securities and Exchange Commission.
323 (b) The following information and data is exempt from the provisions of this chapter:
324 (1) protected health information that a covered entity or business associate collects or
325 processes in accordance with, or documents that a covered entity or business associate creates for
326 the purpose of complying with HIPAA and regulations promulgated under HIPAA, as in effect
327 on the effective date of this Act;
328 (2) patient-identifying information for purposes of 42 USC 290dd-2;
329 (3) identifiable private information for purposes of the federal policy for the protection of
330 human subjects under 45 CFR 46;
331 (4) identifiable private information that is otherwise information collected as part of
332 human subjects research pursuant to the good clinical practice guidelines issued by the
17 of 48

333 International Council for Harmonization of Technical Requirements for Pharmaceuticals for
334 Human Use;
335 (5) the protection of human subjects under 21 CFR Parts 6, 50 and 56, or personal data
336 used or shared in research, as defined in 45 CFR 164.501, that is conducted in accordance with
337 the standards set forth in this subdivision and subdivisions (3) and (4) of this subsection, or other
338 research conducted in accordance with applicable law;
339 (6) information and documents created for purposes of the Health Care Quality
340 Improvement Act of 1986, 42 USC 11101 et seq.;
341 (7) patient safety work product for purposes of the Patient Safety and Quality
342 Improvement Act, 42 USC 299b-21 et seq., as amended from time to time;
343 (8) information derived from any of the health care-related information listed in this
344 subsection that is de-identified in accordance with the requirements for de-identification pursuant
345 to HIPAA;
346 (9) personal information collected, processed, or sold subject to Title V of the Gramm-
347 Leach-Bliley Act, 15 USC 6801 et seq.;
348 (10) the collection, maintenance, disclosure, sale, communication or use of any personal
349 information bearing on a consumer's credit worthiness, credit standing, credit capacity, character,
350 general reputation, personal characteristics or mode of living by a consumer reporting agency,
351 furnisher or user that provides information for use in a consumer report, and by a user of a
352 consumer report, but only to the extent that such activity is regulated by and authorized under the
353 Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 USC 1681 et seq., as amended from time to time;
18 of 48

354 (11) personal data collected, processed, sold or disclosed in compliance with the Driver's
355 Privacy Protection Act of 1994, 18 USC 2721 et seq., as amended from time to time;
356 (12) personal data regulated by the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 USC
357 1232g et seq., as amended from time to time;
358 (13) personal data collected, processed, sold or disclosed in compliance with the Farm
359 Credit Act, 12 USC 2001 et seq., as amended from time to time;
360 (14) data collected, processed, or maintained:
361 (i) in the course of an individual applying to, employed by or acting as an agent or
362 independent contractor of a controller, processor, or third party, to the extent that the data is
363 collected and used within the context of that role;
364 (ii) as the emergency contact information of an individual under this chapter used for
365 emergency contact purposes; or
366 (iii) that is necessary to retain to administer benefits for another individual relating to the
367 individual who is the subject of the information under paragraph (1) of this subsection and used
368 for the purposes of administering such benefits; and
369 (15) personal data collected, processed, sold or disclosed in relation to price, route or
370 service, as such terms are used in the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, 49 USC 40101 et seq., to the
371 extent this chapter is preempted by the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, and the Airline
372 Deregulation Act of 1978, 49 USC 41713, as said acts may be amended from time to time.
19 of 48

373 (c) Controllers and processors that comply with the verifiable parental consent
374 requirements of COPPA shall be deemed compliant with any obligation to obtain parental
375 consent pursuant to this chapter.
376 Section 4. Consumer rights.
377 (a) A consumer shall have the right to:
378 (1) Confirm whether or not a controller is collecting or processing the consumer's
379 personal data and access such personal data, including, but not limited to, any inferences about
380 the consumer derived from such personal data;
381 (2) obtain from a controller a list of specific third parties, other than natural persons, to
382 which the controller has transferred either (i) the consumer’s personal data; or (ii) any personal
383 data;
384 (3) correct inaccuracies in the consumer's personal data, taking into account the nature of
385 the personal data and the purposes of the processing of the consumer's personal data, and instruct
386 a controller or processor to make reasonable efforts to notify all third parties or processors to
387 which the controller has transferred such personal data of such corrections;
388 (4) delete personal data provided by, or obtained about, the consumer, including personal
389 data the consumer provided to the controller, personal data the controller obtained from another
390 source, and derived data and instruct a controller or processor to make reasonable efforts to
391 notify all third parties or processors to which the controller has transferred such personal data of
392 such deletion request;
20 of 48

393 (5) obtain a copy of the consumer's personal data collected or processed by the controller,
394 in a portable and, to the extent technically feasible, readily usable format that allows the
395 consumer to transmit the data to another controller without hindrance, where the processing is
396 carried out by automated means; and
397 (6) opt out of the collection and processing of the consumer’s personal data for purposes
398 of:
399 (i) targeted advertising;
400 (ii) the sale of personal data; or
401 (iii) profiling in furtherance of solely automated decisions that produce legal or similarly
402 significant effects concerning the consumer.
403 (b) A consumer may exercise rights under this section by a secure and reliable means
404 established by the controller and described to the consumer in the controller's privacy notice. A
405 consumer may designate an authorized agent in accordance with section 5 of this act to exercise
406 the rights of such consumer specified in this section on behalf of the consumer. In the case of
407 personal data of a known child, the parent or legal guardian may exercise such consumer rights
408 on the child's behalf. In the case of personal data concerning a consumer subject to a
409 guardianship, conservatorship or other protective arrangement, the guardian or the conservator of
410 the consumer may exercise such rights on the consumer's behalf.
411 (c) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a controller shall comply with a request
412 by a consumer to exercise the consumer rights authorized pursuant to said sections as follows:
21 of 48

413 (1) A controller shall respond to the consumer without undue delay, but not later than 45
414 days after receipt of the request. The controller may extend the response period by 20 additional
415 days when reasonably necessary, considering the complexity and number of the consumer's
416 requests, provided the controller informs the consumer of any such extension within the initial
417 45-day response period and of the reason for the extension.
418 (2) If a controller declines to take action regarding the consumer's request, the controller
419 shall inform the consumer without undue delay, but not later than 45 days after receipt of the
420 request, of the justification for declining to take action and instructions for how to appeal the
421 decision.
422 (3) Information provided in response to a consumer request shall be provided by a
423 controller, free of charge, not less than twice per consumer during any twelve-month period. If
424 requests from a consumer are manifestly unfounded, excessive or repetitive, the controller may
425 charge the consumer a reasonable fee to cover the administrative costs of complying with the
426 request or decline to act on the request. The controller bears the burden of demonstrating the
427 manifestly unfounded, excessive or repetitive nature of the request.
428 (4) If a controller is unable to authenticate a request to exercise any of the rights afforded
429 under paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subsection (a) of this section using commercially
430 reasonable efforts, the controller shall not be required to comply with a request to initiate an
431 action pursuant to this section and shall provide notice to the consumer that the controller is
432 unable to authenticate the request to exercise such right or rights until such consumer provides
433 additional information reasonably necessary to authenticate such consumer and such consumer's
434 request to exercise such right or rights, provided that any such information may not be used for
22 of 48

435 any purposes other than the authentication of such consumer. A controller shall not require
436 authentication to exercise an opt-out request, but a controller may deny an opt-out request if the
437 controller has a good faith, reasonable and documented belief that such request is fraudulent. If a
438 controller denies an opt-out request because the controller believes such request is fraudulent, the
439 controller shall send a notice to the person who made such request disclosing that such controller
440 believes such request is fraudulent, why such controller believes such request is fraudulent and
441 that such controller shall not comply with such request.
442 (5) A controller that has obtained personal data about a consumer from a source other
443 than the consumer shall be deemed in compliance with a consumer's request to delete such data
444 pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of this section by deleting the consumer’s personal
445 data retained by the controller and retaining a record of the deletion request and the minimum
446 data necessary for the purpose of ensuring the consumer's personal data remains deleted from the
447 controller's records and not using such retained data for any other purpose pursuant to this
448 chapter.
449 (d) A controller shall establish a process for a consumer to appeal the controller's refusal
450 to take action on a request within a reasonable period of time after the consumer's receipt of the
451 decision. The appeal process shall be conspicuously available and similar to the process for
452 submitting requests to initiate action pursuant to this section. Not later than 60 days after receipt
453 of an appeal, a controller shall inform the consumer in writing of any action taken or not taken in
454 response to the appeal, including a written explanation of the reasons for the decisions. If the
455 appeal is denied, the controller shall also provide the consumer with an online mechanism, if
456 available, or other method through which the consumer may contact the attorney general to
457 submit a complaint.
23 of 48

458 (e) A controller may not condition, effectively condition, attempt to condition, or attempt
459 to effectively condition the exercise of a right described in this section through—
460 (1) the use of any false, fictitious, fraudulent, or materially misleading statement or
461 representation; or
462 (2) the use of dark patterns.
463 (f) A controller or processor may not collect, process, or transfer personal data in a
464 manner that discriminates against an individual or class of individuals, or otherwise makes
465 unavailable the equal enjoyment of goods or services, on the basis of an individual's or class of
466 individuals’ actual or perceived race, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability,
467 religion, genetic information, pregnancy or condition related to pregnancy, status as a veteran,
468 ancestry or national origin, or any other basis protected by chapter 151B.
469 (g) Subsection (f) does not apply to:
470 (1) The collection, processing, or transfer of personal data for the sole purpose of:
471 (i) A controller or processor’s self-testing to prevent or mitigate unlawful discrimination
472 or otherwise to ensure compliance with state or federal law; or
473 (ii) Diversifying an applicant, participant or customer pool; or
474 (2) A private establishment, as described in 42 United States Code, Section 2000a(e).
475 Section 5. Authorized agent.
476 A consumer may designate another person to serve as the consumer's authorized agent,
477 and act on such consumer's behalf, to exercise rights specified in subsection (a) of section 4 of
24 of 48

478 this act. A controller shall comply with a request received from an authorized agent if the
479 controller is able to verify, with commercially reasonable effort, the identity of the consumer and
480 the authorized agent's authority to act on such consumer's behalf.
481 Section 6. Actions of controllers.
482 (a) A controller shall:
483 (1) limit the collection of personal data to what is reasonably necessary and proportionate
484 to provide or maintain a specific product or service requested by the consumer to whom the data
485 pertains, including any routine administrative, operational, or account-servicing activity, such as
486 billing, shipping, delivery, storage, accounting, or sending communications;
487 (2) not process or transfer personal data concerning a consumer in a manner that is
488 inconsistent with the reasonable expectations of the consumer;
489 (3) not collect, process, or transfer sensitive data concerning a consumer except when
490 such collection, processing, or transfer is strictly necessary to provide or maintain a specific
491 product or service requested by the consumer to whom the sensitive data pertains;
492 (4) not sell:
493 (i) precise geolocation data regarding a consumer; or
494 (ii) sensitive data other than precise geolocation data regarding a consumer without
495 obtaining the consumer’s affirmative consent;
496 (5) establish, implement and maintain reasonable administrative, technical and physical
497 data security practices to protect the confidentiality, integrity and accessibility of personal data
25 of 48

498 appropriate to the volume and nature of the personal data at issue, including disposing of
499 personal data in accordance with a retention schedule that requires the deletion of personal data
500 when the data is required to be deleted by law or is no longer necessary for the purpose for which
501 the data was collected, processed, or transferred;
502 (6) not transfer or sell sensitive data concerning a consumer without obtaining the
503 consumer's affirmative consent, or, in the case of the collection or processing of personal data
504 concerning a known child, without collecting or processing such data in accordance with
505 COPPA;
506 (7) provide an effective mechanism for a consumer to revoke the consumer's affirmative
507 consent under this chapter that is at least as easy as the mechanism by which the consumer
508 provided the consumer's affirmative consent and, upon revocation of such affirmative consent,
509 cease to process the data as soon as practicable, but not later than fifteen days after the receipt of
510 such request;
511 (8) not collect or process the personal data of a consumer for purposes of targeted
512 advertising or first-party advertising, or sell the consumer's personal data, under circumstances
513 where a controller has actual knowledge, or willfully disregards, that the consumer is a minor;
514 and
515 (9) not discriminate or retaliate against a consumer for exercising any of the consumer
516 rights contained in this chapter, or for refusing to agree to the collection or processing of
517 personal data for a separate product or service, including denying goods or services, charging
518 different prices or rates for goods or services or providing a different level of quality of goods or
519 services to the consumer.
26 of 48

520 (b) Nothing in paragraph (9) of subsection (a) shall be construed to require a controller to
521 provide a product or service that requires the personal data of a consumer which the controller
522 does not collect or maintain, or prohibit a controller from offering a different price, rate, level,
523 quality or selection of goods or services to a consumer, including offering goods or services for
524 no fee, if the offering is in connection with a consumer's voluntary participation in a bona fide
525 loyalty, rewards, premium features, discounts, club card, or similar program, provided that:
526 (1) the controller may not transfer personal data to a third party as part of such program
527 unless such transfer is clearly and conspicuously disclosed in the terms of the program; and
528 (2) the sale of personal data shall not be a condition of participation in the program.
529 A controller shall not use financial incentive practices that are unjust, unreasonable,
530 coercive or usurious in nature.
531 (c) A controller shall provide consumers with a reasonably accessible, clear and
532 meaningful privacy notice that includes:
533 (1) The categories of personal data collected and processed by the controller, including a
534 separate list of categories of sensitive data collected and processed by the controller, described in
535 a level of detail that provides consumers a meaningful understanding of the type of personal data
536 collected or processed;
537 (2) the purpose for collecting and processing each category of personal data the controller
538 collects or processes described in a way that gives consumers a meaningful understanding of
539 how each category of their personal data will be used;
27 of 48

540 (3) how consumers may exercise their consumer rights, including how a consumer may
541 appeal a controller's decision with regard to the consumer's request;
542 (4) the categories of personal data that the controller transfers to third parties, if any, and
543 the purposes for those transfers;
544 (5) the categories of third parties, if any, to which the controller transfers personal data;
545 (6) The length of time the controller intends to retain each category of personal data, or, if
546 it is not possible to identify the length of time, the criteria used to determine the length of time
547 the controller intends to retain categories of personal data; and
548 (7) an active electronic mail address or other online mechanism that the consumer may
549 use to contact the controller.
550 The privacy notice shall be provided directly to consumers and made available online to
551 the general public. If a controller makes a material change to its privacy notice, the controller
552 shall notify each consumer affected by the material change before implementing the material
553 change with respect to prospectively collected personal data and provide a reasonable
554 opportunity for each consumer to withdraw consent. A controller should provide a reasonable
555 opportunity for each consumer to affirmatively consent to further materially different processing
556 or transfer of previously collected personal data under the changed policy. The controller shall
557 take all reasonable electronic measures to provide direct notification regarding material changes
558 to the privacy notice to each affected consumer, taking into account available technology and the
559 nature of the relationship.
28 of 48

560 (d) If a controller sells personal data to third parties or processes personal data for
561 targeted advertising, the controller shall clearly and conspicuously disclose such sales or
562 processing, as well as the manner in which a consumer may exercise the right to opt out of such
563 sales or processing.
564 (e) A controller shall establish, and shall describe in a privacy notice, not less than two
565 secure and reliable means for consumers to submit a request to exercise their consumer rights
566 pursuant to this chapter. Such means shall take into account the ways in which consumers
567 normally interact with the controller, the need for secure and reliable communication of such
568 requests and the ability of the controller to verify the identity of the consumer making the
569 request. A controller shall not require a consumer to create a new account in order to exercise
570 consumer rights, but may require a consumer to use an existing account. Any such means shall
571 include:
572 (1) Providing a clear and conspicuous link on the controller's Internet web site to an
573 Internet web page that enables a consumer, or an agent of the consumer, to opt out of the targeted
574 advertising, the sale of the consumer's personal data, and profiling in furtherance of solely
575 automated decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning the consumer;
576 and
577 (2) Not later than 18 months after the effective date of this chapter, allowing a consumer
578 to opt out of any collection or processing of the consumer's personal data for the purposes of
579 targeted advertising, or any sale of the consumer’s personal data, through an opt-out preference
580 signal sent, with such consumer's consent, by a platform, technology or mechanism to the
29 of 48

581 controller indicating such consumer's intent to opt out of any such processing or sale. Such
582 platform, technology or mechanism shall:
583 (i) Be consumer-friendly and easy to use by the average consumer; and
584 (ii) Enable the controller to reasonably determine whether the consumer is a resident of
585 this state and whether the consumer has made a legitimate request to opt out of any sale of such
586 consumer's personal data or targeted advertising. For purposes of this subsection, the use of an
587 internet protocol address to estimate the consumer’s location shall be considered sufficient to
588 reasonably determine residency.
589 If a consumer's decision to opt out of any processing of the consumer's personal data for
590 the purposes of targeted advertising, or any sale of personal data, through an opt-out preference
591 signal sent in accordance with the provisions of this subsection conflicts with the consumer's
592 existing controller-specific privacy setting or voluntary participation in a controller's financial
593 incentive program, the controller shall comply with such consumer's opt-out preference signal
594 but may notify such consumer of such conflict and provide to such consumer the choice to
595 confirm such controller-specific privacy setting or participation in such program.
596 (f) If a controller responds to consumer opt‐out requests received pursuant to subsection
597 (e) of this section by informing the consumer of a change in the price, rate, level, quality, or
598 selection of goods or services, the controller shall present the terms of any financial incentive
599 offered pursuant to subsection (b) of this section for the processing, sale or transfer of the
600 consumer's personal data.
601 (g) For the purposes of paragraphs (1) and (3) of subsection (a), “requested by the
602 consumer” shall not be construed to require an express or written request for a product or service
30 of 48

603 prior to the collection, processing or transfer of a consumer’s personal data. A controller shall
604 determine that a consumer is requesting a product or service based on objective circumstances
605 that indicate that a consumer is seeking such product or service, including, but not limited to, (i)
606 whether the consumer has registered for, downloaded or otherwise deliberately used an account,
607 application, service or website, (ii) the consumer’s relationship with the controller and (iii) the
608 manner in which such product or service is customarily delivered or rendered in the ordinary
609 course of business. A controller may draw inferences as is reasonably necessary based upon such
610 objective circumstances, provided, however, that inferences shall not be drawn in a manner
611 inconsistent with the reasonable expectations of the consumer.
612 (h) For the purposes of subsection (g) and paragraph (2) of subsection (a), the
613 “reasonable expectations of the consumer” shall be based on the following: (i) the relationship
614 between the consumer and the controller; (ii) the type, nature, and amount of personal data that
615 the controller seeks to collect; (iii) the source of the personal data and the controller’s method for
616 collecting it; (iv) the specificity and clarity of information provided to the consumer about the
617 purpose for collecting their personal data; (v) the degree to which the involvement of processors
618 and third parties in the collecting or processing of personal data is apparent to the consumer.
619 Section 7. Responsibilities of processors and controllers.
620 (a) A processor shall adhere to the instructions of a controller and shall assist the
621 controller in meeting the controller's obligations under this chapter. Such assistance shall
622 include:
31 of 48

623 (1) taking into account the nature of processing and the information available to the
624 processor, by appropriate technical and organizational measures, insofar as is reasonably
625 practicable, to fulfill the controller's obligation to respond to consumer rights requests;
626 (2) taking into account the nature of processing and the information available to the
627 processor, by assisting the controller in meeting the controller's obligations in relation to the
628 security of processing the personal data and in relation to the notification of a breach of security
629 of the system of the processor, in order to meet the controller's obligations; and
630 (3) providing necessary information to enable the controller to conduct and document
631 data protection assessments.
632 (b) A contract between a controller and a processor shall govern the processor's data
633 processing procedures with respect to processing performed on behalf of the controller. The
634 contract shall be written, binding and clearly set forth instructions for processing data, the nature
635 and purpose of processing, the type of data subject to processing, the duration of processing and
636 the rights and obligations of both parties including a method by which the processor shall notify
637 the covered entity of material changes to its privacy practices. The processor shall adhere to the
638 instructions of the controller and only process and transfer the data it receives from the controller
639 to the extent necessary to provide a service requested by the controller, as set out in the contract.
640 The contract shall also require that the processor:
641 (1) Ensure that each person processing personal data is subject to a duty of confidentiality
642 with respect to the data;
32 of 48

643 (2) at the controller's direction, delete or return all personal data to the controller as
644 requested at the end of the provision of services, unless retention of the personal data is required
645 by law;
646 (3) upon the reasonable request of the controller, make available to the controller all
647 information in its possession necessary to demonstrate the processor's compliance with the
648 obligations in this chapter;
649 (4) after providing the controller an opportunity to object, engage any subcontractor
650 pursuant to a written contract that requires the subcontractor to meet the contractual and statutory
651 or regulatory obligations of the processor with respect to the personal data;
652 (5) be prohibited from combining personal data that the processor receives from or on
653 behalf of a controller with personal data that the processor receives from or on behalf of another
654 person or collects from the interaction of the processor with an individual; and
655 (6) allow, and cooperate with, reasonable assessments by the controller or the controller's
656 designated assessor, or the processor may arrange for a qualified and independent assessor to
657 conduct an assessment of the processor's policies and technical and organizational measures in
658 support of the obligations under this chapter, using an appropriate and accepted control standard
659 or framework and assessment procedure for such assessments. The processor shall provide a
660 report of such assessment to the controller upon request.
661 (c) A processor shall establish, implement and maintain reasonable administrative,
662 technical and physical data security practices to protect the confidentiality, integrity and
663 accessibility of personal data that are consistent with chapter 93H and appropriate to the volume
664 and nature of the personal data at issue.
33 of 48

665 (d) Nothing in the contract in subsection (b) shall relieve a controller or processor from
666 the liabilities imposed on the controller or processor by virtue of such controller's or processor's
667 role in the processing relationship, as described in this chapter.
668 (e) Determining whether a person is acting as a controller or processor with respect to a
669 specific processing of data is a fact-based determination that depends upon the context in which
670 personal data is to be processed. A person who is not limited in such person's processing of
671 personal data pursuant to a controller's instructions, or who fails to adhere to such instructions, is
672 a controller and not a processor with respect to a specific processing of data. A processor that
673 continues to adhere to a controller's instructions with respect to a specific processing of personal
674 data remains a processor. If a processor begins, alone or jointly with others, determining the
675 purposes and means of the processing of personal data, the processor is a controller with respect
676 to such processing and may be subject to an enforcement action under this chapter.
677 (f) A processor shall not process or transfer personal data on the behalf of a controller if
678 the processor has actual knowledge that the controller has violated this chapter with respect to
679 such personal data.
680 Section 8. Data Protection Assessments.
681 (a) A controller shall not conduct processing that presents a heightened risk of harm to a
682 consumer without conducting and documenting a data protection assessment for each of the
683 controller's processing activities that presents such heightened risk of harm to a consumer. For
684 the purposes of this section, processing that presents a heightened risk of harm to a consumer
685 includes:
686 (1) The collection or processing of personal data for the purposes of targeted advertising;
34 of 48

687 (2) the sale of personal data;
688 (3) the processing of personal data for the purposes of profiling, where such profiling
689 presents a reasonably foreseeable risk of:
690 (i) unfair or deceptive treatment of, or unlawful disparate impact on, consumers,
691 (ii) financial, physical or reputational injury to consumers,
692 (iii) a physical or other intrusion upon the solitude or seclusion, or the private affairs or
693 concerns, of consumers, where such intrusion would be offensive to a reasonable person, or
694 (iv) other substantial injury to consumers;
695 (4) the collection or processing of sensitive data; and
696 (5) the collection or processing of personal information collected via a consumer’s use of
697 a product or service predominantly used by minors.
698 (b) Data protection assessments conducted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall
699 identify the categories of personal data collected, the purposes for collecting such personal data,
700 whether personal data is being transferred and identify and weigh the benefits that may flow,
701 directly and indirectly, from the processing to the controller, the consumer, other stakeholders
702 and the public against the potential risks to the rights of the consumer associated with such
703 processing, as mitigated by safeguards that are employed by the controller to reduce such risks.
704 The controller shall factor into any such data protection assessment the use of de-identified data
705 and the reasonable expectations of consumers, as well as the context of the processing and the
706 relationship between the controller and the consumer whose personal data will be processed.
35 of 48

707 (c) No later than 30 days after completing a data protection assessment under this section,
708 a controller shall submit a report of the data protection assessment or evaluation to the attorney
709 general. The report must include a summary of the data protection assessment and the controller
710 shall make the summary publicly available in a place that is easily accessible to consumers.
711 Controllers may redact trade secrets or other confidential or proprietary information from the
712 report. The attorney general may require that a controller disclose any data protection assessment
713 that is relevant to an investigation conducted by the attorney general, and the controller shall
714 make the data protection assessment available to the attorney general. The attorney general may
715 evaluate the data protection assessment for compliance with the responsibilities set forth in this
716 chapter. To the extent any information contained in a data protection assessment disclosed to the
717 attorney general includes information subject to attorney-client privilege or work product
718 protection, such disclosure shall not constitute a waiver of such privilege or protection.
719 (d) A single data protection assessment may address a comparable set of processing
720 operations that include similar activities.
721 (e) If a controller conducts a data protection assessment for the purpose of complying
722 with another applicable law or regulation, the data protection assessment shall be deemed to
723 satisfy the requirements established in this section if such data protection assessment is
724 reasonably similar in scope and effect to the data protection assessment that would otherwise be
725 conducted pursuant to this section.
726 (f) A controller shall review and update the data protection assessment as often as
727 appropriate considering the type, amount, and sensitivity of personal data collected or processed
36 of 48

728 and level of risk presented by the processing, throughout the processing activity’s lifecycle in
729 order to:
730 (1) monitor for harm caused by the processing and adjust safeguards accordingly; and
731 (2) ensure that data protection and privacy are considered as the controller makes new
732 decisions with respect to the processing.
733 Section 9. De-identified data.
734 (a) Any controller in possession of de-identified data shall:
735 (1) Take technical measures to ensure that the data cannot be associated with an
736 individual;
737 (2) publicly commit to maintaining and using de-identified data without attempting to re-
738 identify the data; and
739 (3) contractually obligate any recipients of the de-identified data to comply with all
740 provisions of this chapter.
741 (b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to:
742 (1) Require a controller or processor to re-identify de-identified data; or
743 (2) maintain data in identifiable form, or collect, obtain, retain or access any data or
744 technology, in order to be capable of associating an authenticated consumer request with
745 personal data.
37 of 48

746 (c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require a controller or processor to
747 comply with an authenticated consumer rights request if the controller:
748 (1) is not reasonably capable of associating the request with the personal data or it would
749 be unreasonably burdensome for the controller to associate the request with the personal data;
750 and
751 (2) does not use the personal data to recognize or respond to the specific consumer who is
752 the subject of the personal data, or associate the personal data with other personal data about the
753 same specific consumer;
754 (d) A controller that transfers de-identified data shall exercise reasonable oversight to
755 monitor compliance with any contractual commitments to which the de-identified data is subject
756 and shall take appropriate steps to address any breaches of those contractual commitments.
757 Section 10. Limitations.
758 (a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to restrict a controller's or processor's
759 ability to:
760 (1) Comply with federal, state or municipal ordinances or regulations;
761 (2) comply with a civil, criminal or regulatory inquiry, investigation, subpoena or
762 summons by federal, state, municipal or other governmental authorities, except as prohibited by
763 another law, including, but not limited to, section 115 of chapter 93;
764 (3) cooperate with law enforcement agencies concerning conduct or activity that the
765 controller or processor reasonably and in good faith believes may violate federal, state or
766 municipal ordinances or regulations;
38 of 48

767 (4) investigate, establish, exercise, prepare for or defend legal claims;
768 (5) provide, maintain, improve, or update a product or service specifically requested by
769 the consumer;
770 (6) perform under a contract to which a consumer is a party, including fulfilling the terms
771 of a written warranty;
772 (7) take steps at the request of a consumer prior to entering into a contract;
773 (8) take immediate steps to protect an interest that is essential for the life or physical
774 safety of the consumer or another individual, and where the processing cannot be manifestly
775 based on another legal basis;
776 (9) prevent, detect, protect against or respond to security incidents, identity theft, fraud,
777 harassment, malicious or deceptive activities or any illegal activity targeted at or involving the
778 controller or processor or its services, preserve the integrity or security of systems or investigate,
779 report or prosecute those responsible for any such action, provided that for the purposes of this
780 paragraph, “illegal activity” means a violation of a federal, state, or local law punishable as a
781 felony or misdemeanor that can directly harm;
782 (10) engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific, historical, or statistical research in the
783 public interest that adheres to all relevant laws and regulations governing such research, if
784 applicable, and is approved, monitored and governed by an institutional review board that
785 determines, or similar independent oversight entities that determine,
39 of 48

786 (i) whether the deletion of personal data requested by a consumer under section 4,
787 subsection (a), paragraph (4) is likely to provide substantial benefits that do not exclusively
788 accrue to the controller,
789 (ii) the expected benefits of the research outweigh the privacy risks, and
790 (iii) whether the controller has implemented reasonable safeguards to mitigate privacy
791 risks associated with research, including any risks associated with re-identification;
792 (11) assist another controller, processor or third party with any of the obligations under
793 this chapter;
794 (12) process personal data for reasons of public interest in the area of public health,
795 community health or population health, but solely to the extent that such processing is
796 (i) subject to suitable and specific measures to safeguard the rights of the consumer
797 whose personal data is being processed, and
798 (ii) under the responsibility of a professional subject to confidentiality obligations under
799 federal, state or local law;
800 (13) ensure the data security and integrity of personal data as required by this chapter,
801 protect against spam, or protect and maintain networks and systems, including through
802 diagnostics, debugging, and repairs;
803 (14) effectuate a product recall pursuant to federal or state law, or to fulfill a warranty;
804 (15) conduct medical research in compliance with part 46 of title 45, Code of Federal
805 Regulations, or parts 50 and 56 of title 21, Code of Federal Regulations
40 of 48

806 (16) publish entity-based member or employee contact information where such
807 publication is intended to allow members of the public to contact such member or employee in
808 the ordinary course of the entity’s operations;
809 (17) process personal data previously collected in accordance with this chapter such that
810 the personal data becomes de-identified data, including to:
811 (i) Conduct internal research to develop, improve or repair products, services or
812 technology;
813 (ii) identify and repair technical errors that impair existing or intended functionality; or;
814 (iii) perform internal operations that are reasonably aligned with the expectations of the
815 consumer or reasonably anticipated based on the consumer's existing relationship with the
816 controller, or are otherwise compatible with processing data in furtherance of the provision of a
817 product or service specifically requested by a consumer or the performance of a contract to
818 which the consumer is a party; or
819 (18) provide information or feedback to the consumer either in response to a query or for
820 the purpose of providing a product or service requested by the consumer.
821 (b) The obligations imposed on controllers or processors under this chapter shall not
822 apply where compliance by the controller or processor with said sections would violate an
823 evidentiary privilege under the laws of this state. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to
824 prevent a controller or processor from providing personal data concerning a consumer to a
825 person covered by an evidentiary privilege under the laws of the state as part of a privileged
826 communication.
41 of 48

827 (c) A controller or processor that discloses personal data to a processor or third-party
828 controller in accordance with this chapter shall not be deemed to have violated said sections if
829 the processor or third-party controller that receives and processes such personal data violates said
830 sections, provided, at the time the disclosing controller or processor disclosed such personal data,
831 the disclosing controller or processor did not have actual knowledge that the receiving processor
832 or third-party controller would violate said sections. A third-party controller or processor
833 receiving personal data from a controller or processor in compliance with this chapter is likewise
834 not in violation of said sections for the transgressions of the controller or processor from which
835 such third-party controller or processor receives such personal data.
836 (d) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to:
837 (1) Impose any obligation on a controller or processor that adversely affects the rights or
838 freedoms of any person, including, but not limited to, the rights of any person to freedom of
839 speech or freedom of the press guaranteed in the First Amendment to the United States
840 Constitution or Article 16 of the Massachusetts Declaration of Rights;
841 (2) apply to any person's collection or processing of personal data in the course of such
842 person's purely personal or household activities; or
843 (3) for private schools approved under section 1 of chapter 76 and private institutions of
844 higher education as defined by title I of the Higher Education Act of 1965, 20 United States
845 Code, Section 1001 et seq., require deletion of personal data that would unreasonably interfere
846 with the provision of education services by or the ordinary operation of the school or institution.
847 (e) Personal data collected or processed by a controller pursuant to this section may be
848 collected or processed to the extent that such collection and processing is:
42 of 48

849 (1) Reasonably necessary and proportionate to the purposes listed in this section, or, in
850 the case of sensitive data, strictly necessary to the purposes listed in this section;
851 (2) limited to what is necessary in relation to the specific purposes listed in this section.
852 Personal data processed pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall, where applicable, take
853 into account the nature and purpose or purposes of such processing. Such data shall be subject to
854 reasonable administrative, technical and physical measures to protect the confidentiality,
855 integrity and accessibility of the personal data and to reduce reasonably foreseeable risks of harm
856 to consumers relating to such processing of personal data; and
857 (3) compliant with subsection (f) of section 4.
858 (f) If a controller collects or processes personal data pursuant to an exemption in this
859 section, the controller bears the burden of demonstrating that such collection or processing
860 qualifies for the exemption and complies with the requirements in subsection (e) of this section.
861 Section 11. Rulemaking.
862 (a) The attorney general may promulgate rules and regulations to implement this Act,
863 including, but not limited to, rules and regulations that:
864 (1) establish or adopt baseline technical requirements that determine if a given dataset has
865 been or can be considered sufficiently de-identified;
866 (2) establish reasonable administrative, technical and physical data security practices that
867 satisfy the requirements set forward in paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of section 6;
868 (3) establish a nonexclusive list of practices that constitute dark patterns or otherwise
869 violate the requirements of this chapter regarding a consumer’s affirmative consent; and
43 of 48

870 (4) establish a nonexclusive list of data collection, processing, and transfer practices that
871 constitute unfair or deceptive practices in trade or commerce.
872 Section 12. Enforcement.
873 (a) A violation of this chapter shall constitute an unfair or deceptive trade practice for
874 purposes of chapter 93A. Notwithstanding sections 9 and 11 of said chapter 93A, the attorney
875 general shall have exclusive authority to bring a civil action against any controller or processor
876 other than a controller or processor that is a large data holder that violates this chapter or a
877 regulation adopted under this chapter to:
878 (1) enjoin an act or practice that is in violation of this chapter or a regulation adopted
879 under this chapter, including an order that an entity retrieve any personal data transferred in such
880 violation;
881 (2) enforce compliance with this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter,
882 including seeking declaratory relief;
883 (3) obtain damages, including punitive damages, restitution of any money or property
884 obtained directly or indirectly by any such violation, and disgorgement of any profits, assets,
885 property, or data obtained directly or indirectly by any such violation on behalf of the residents
886 of the commonwealth;
887 (4) impose civil penalties in an amount not more than $5,000 per violation;
888 (5) obtain investigative costs, reasonable attorney’s fees and other litigation costs,
889 including, but not limited to, expert fees, reasonably incurred; and
890 (6) obtain any such other and further relief as the court may deem proper.
44 of 48

891 (b) If the court finds that a defendant has engaged in flagrant, willful, and repeated
892 violations of this chapter in an action brought by the attorney general pursuant to subsection (a)
893 of this section, the court may issue an order to suspend or prohibit the defendant from operating
894 in the commonwealth in addition to any other remedies under subsection (a) of this section.
895 (c) When calculating awards and civil penalties in any action under this section, the court
896 shall consider:
897 (1) the number of affected individuals and the amount and sensitivity of any personal data
898 at issue;
899 (2) the severity of the violation or noncompliance;
900 (3) the risks caused by the violation or noncompliance;
901 (4) whether the violation or noncompliance was part of a pattern of noncompliance and
902 violations and not an isolated instance;
903 (5) whether the violation or noncompliance was willful and not the result of error;
904 (6) the precautions taken by the defendant to prevent a violation;
905 (7) the number of administrative actions, lawsuits, settlements, and consent-decrees under
906 this chapter involving the defendant;
907 (8) the number of administrative actions, lawsuits, settlements, and consent-decrees
908 involving the defendant in other states and at the federal level in issues involving information
909 privacy; and
910 (9) the international record of the defendant when it comes to information privacy issues.
45 of 48

911 (d) Any provision of a contract or agreement of any kind, including but not limited to a
912 controller’s terms of service or a privacy policy that purports to waive or limit in any way an
913 individual’s rights under this chapter, including but not limited to any right to a remedy or means
914 of enforcement, shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be void and unenforceable.
915 (e) The attorney general shall create, maintain and monitor a mechanism for consumers to
916 report potential violations of this chapter.
917 (f) The attorney general shall issue an annual report to the clerks of the house and senate,
918 the speaker of the house, the senate president, and the house and senate chairs of the joint
919 committee on advanced information technology, the Internet and cybersecurity in a manner
920 consistent with the requirements of section 11 of chapter 12, provided, however, that such report
921 shall only relate to the enforcement of this chapter and its regulations.
922 Section 13. Relationship to Other Laws
923 Nothing in this chapter shall diminish any individual’s rights or obligations under any
924 other chapter or under any regulations promulgated thereunder.
925 Section 14. Location Information of Non-Residents
926 (a) With respect to precise geolocation data that reveals that an individual or a device that
927 identifies or is linked or reasonably linkable to 1 or more individuals is presently or was
928 previously in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts:
929 (1) an individual shall have the same rights, privileges, and protections as a consumer
930 under this chapter for all such precise geolocation data; and
46 of 48

931 (2) a controller shall treat such precise geolocation data in the same manner as it would
932 the precise geolocation data of a consumer under this chapter.
933 (b) Subsection (a) does not apply to the extent that an individual is acting as an employee,
934 owner, director, officer or contractor of a company, partnership, sole proprietorship, nonprofit or
935 government agency, but only if the individual’s precise geolocation data is collected, processed,
936 or transferred solely in relation to that individual’s role with the company, partnership, sole
937 proprietorship, nonprofit or government agency.
938 Section 15. Mergers, Acquisitions, and Bankruptcies
939 (a) A controller may transfer personal data to a third party in the context of a merger,
940 acquisition, bankruptcy or similar transaction when the third party assumes control, in whole or
941 in part, of the controller’s assets, only if the controller, in a reasonable time prior to the transfer,
942 provides an affected consumer with:
943 (1) notice describing the transfer, including the name of the entity receiving the
944 consumer’s personal data and the applicable privacy policies of such entity; and
945 (2) a reasonable opportunity to withdraw previously provided consent related to the
946 consumer’s personal data or otherwise exercise the rights guaranteed by this chapter.
947 (b) In any transaction involving the transfer of genetic, neural, or biometric data, the
948 reasonable opportunity under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) shall be no shorter than 60 days.
949 (c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish the requirements of paragraph
950 (6) of subsection (a) of section 6.
951 Section 16. Browser Privacy Settings
47 of 48

952 By January 1, 2027, a person shall not develop or maintain a browser that does not
953 include a setting that enables a consumer to send an opt-out preference signal, as described in
954 section 6(e)(2), to controllers or processors that the consumer interacts with through the browser.
955 SECTION 2. SECTION 1 shall take effect 180 days after enactment.
956 SECTION 3. The first data protection assessments required by section 8 of the
957 Massachusetts Consumer Data Privacy Act shall be completed no later than the first anniversary
958 of the effective date of this Act.
48 of 48